Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202044-9202
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Public Adjusters Licensing Act is to govern the qualifications and procedures for licensing public adjusters in this state and to specify the duties of and restrictions on public adjusters, including limitation of such licensure to assisting only insureds with first-party claims.

Laws 2018, LB743, § 2.